Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2904
Infrastructure development investment program; created; commission; administer.

(1) The infrastructure development investment program is created and shall be housed within the department for administrative purposes.

(2) The commission shall administer the investment program, with administrative and operational support from the department. The department shall provide the commission with the necessary personnel to manage the day-to-day operations of the investment program.

(3) The commission is the final authority for selecting projects to receive financial assistance from the investment program.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 4.
July 18, 2026